Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1706
Firm, defined.

Firm shall mean any individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, association, or other legal entity permitted by law to practice architecture, engineering, landscape architecture, or land surveying in the state.

Laws 1978, LB 715, § 6;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 543.